Illinois, session 104th, SB1235.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 9.15 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/9.15)7    Sec. 9.15. Greenhouse gases.8    (a) An air pollution construction permit shall not be 9required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 10equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 11defined by 40 CFR 52.21, as now or hereafter amended, for 12greenhouse gases. This exemption does or is otherwise not 13addressed in this Section or by the Board in regulations for 14greenhouse gases. These exemptions do not relieve an owner or 15operator from the obligation to comply with other applicable 16rules or regulations.17    (b) An air pollution operating permit shall not be 18required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 19equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 20defined by Section 39.5 of this Act, for greenhouse gases. 21This exemption does or is otherwise not addressed in this 22Section or by the Board in regulations for greenhouse gases. 23These exemptions do not relieve an owner or operator from the   SB1235- 2 -LRB104 03354 BDA 13376 b1obligation to comply with other applicable rules or 2regulations.3    (c) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this 4Section, an air pollution construction or operating permit 5shall not be required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if 6any of the following events occur: (Blank).7        (1) enactment of federal legislation depriving the 8    Administrator of the USEPA of authority to regulate 9    greenhouse gases under the Clean Air Act;10        (2) the issuance of any opinion, ruling, judgment, 11    order, or decree by a federal court depriving the 12    Administrator of the USEPA of authority to regulate 13    greenhouse gases under the Clean Air Act; or14        (3) action by the President of the United States or 15    the President's authorized agent, including the 16    Administrator of the USEPA, to repeal or withdraw the 17    Greenhouse Gas Tailoring Rule (75 Fed. Reg. 31514, June 3, 18    2010).19    This subsection (c) does not relieve an owner or operator 20from the obligation to comply with applicable rules or 21regulations other than those relating to greenhouse gases. 22    (d) If any event listed in subsection (c) of this Section 23occurs, permits issued after such event shall not impose 24permit terms or conditions addressing greenhouse gases during 25the effectiveness of any event listed in subsection (c). 26(Blank).  SB1235- 3 -LRB104 03354 BDA 13376 b1    (e) If an event listed in subsection (c) of this Section 2occurs, any owner or operator with a permit that includes 3terms or conditions addressing greenhouse gases may elect to 4submit an application to the Agency to address a revision or 5repeal of such terms or conditions. The Agency shall 6expeditiously process such permit application in accordance 7with applicable laws and regulations. (Blank). 8    (f) (Blank). As used in this Section:9    "Carbon dioxide emission" means the plant annual CO2 total 10output emission as measured by the United States Environmental 11Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 12Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor. 13    "Carbon dioxide equivalent emissions" or "CO2e" means the 14sum total of the mass amount of emissions in tons per year, 15calculated by multiplying the mass amount of each of the 6 16greenhouse gases specified in Section 3.207, in tons per year, 17by its associated global warming potential as set forth in 40 18CFR 98, subpart A, table A-1 or its successor, and then adding 19them all together.20    "Cogeneration" or "combined heat and power" refers to any 21system that, either simultaneously or sequentially, produces 22electricity and useful thermal energy from a single fuel 23source.24    "Copollutants" refers to the 6 criteria pollutants that 25have been identified by the United States Environmental 26Protection Agency pursuant to the Clean Air Act.  SB1235- 4 -LRB104 03354 BDA 13376 b1    "Electric generating unit" or "EGU" means a fossil 2fuel-fired stationary boiler, combustion turbine, or combined 3cycle system that serves a generator that has a nameplate 4capacity greater than 25 MWe and produces electricity for 5sale.6    "Environmental justice community" means the definition of 7that term based on existing methodologies and findings, used 8and as may be updated by the Illinois Power Agency and its 9program administrator in the Illinois Solar for All Program.10    "Equity investment eligible community" or "eligible 11community" means the geographic areas throughout Illinois that 12would most benefit from equitable investments by the State 13designed to combat discrimination and foster sustainable 14economic growth. Specifically, eligible community means the 15following areas:16        (1) areas where residents have been historically 17    excluded from economic opportunities, including 18    opportunities in the energy sector, as defined as R3 areas 19    pursuant to Section 10-40 of the Cannabis Regulation and 20    Tax Act; and21        (2) areas where residents have been historically 22    subject to disproportionate burdens of pollution, 23    including pollution from the energy sector, as established 24    by environmental justice communities as defined by the 25    Illinois Power Agency pursuant to the Illinois Power 26    Agency Act, excluding any racial or ethnic indicators.  SB1235- 5 -LRB104 03354 BDA 13376 b1    "Equity investment eligible person" or "eligible person" 2means the persons who would most benefit from equitable 3investments by the State designed to combat discrimination and 4foster sustainable economic growth. Specifically, eligible 5person means the following people:6        (1) persons whose primary residence is in an equity 7    investment eligible community;8        (2) persons whose primary residence is in a 9    municipality, or a county with a population under 100,000, 10    where the closure of an electric generating unit or mine 11    has been publicly announced or the electric generating 12    unit or mine is in the process of closing or closed within 13    the last 5 years;14        (3) persons who are graduates of or currently enrolled 15    in the foster care system; or16        (4) persons who were formerly incarcerated.17    "Existing emissions" means: 18        (1) for CO2e, the total average tons-per-year of CO2e 19    emitted by the EGU or large GHG-emitting unit either in 20    the years 2018 through 2020 or, if the unit was not yet in 21    operation by January 1, 2018, in the first 3 full years of 22    that unit's operation; and23        (2) for any copollutant, the total average 24    tons-per-year of that copollutant emitted by the EGU or 25    large GHG-emitting unit either in the years 2018 through 26    2020 or, if the unit was not yet in operation by January 1,   SB1235- 6 -LRB104 03354 BDA 13376 b1    2018, in the first 3 full years of that unit's operation. 2    "Green hydrogen" means a power plant technology in which 3an EGU creates electric power exclusively from electrolytic 4hydrogen, in a manner that produces zero carbon and 5copollutant emissions, using hydrogen fuel that is 6electrolyzed using a 100% renewable zero carbon emission 7energy source.8    "Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit" or "large 9GHG-emitting unit" means a unit that is an electric generating 10unit or other fossil fuel-fired unit that itself has a 11nameplate capacity or serves a generator that has a nameplate 12capacity greater than 25 MWe and that produces electricity, 13including, but not limited to, coal-fired, coal-derived, 14oil-fired, natural gas-fired, and cogeneration units.15    "NOx emission rate" means the plant annual NOx total output 16emission rate as measured by the United States Environmental 17Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 18Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the most 19recent year for which data is available.20    "Public greenhouse gas-emitting units" or "public 21GHG-emitting unit" means large greenhouse gas-emitting units, 22including EGUs, that are wholly owned, directly or indirectly, 23by one or more municipalities, municipal corporations, joint 24municipal electric power agencies, electric cooperatives, or 25other governmental or nonprofit entities, whether organized 26and created under the laws of Illinois or another state.  SB1235- 7 -LRB104 03354 BDA 13376 b1    "SO2 emission rate" means the "plant annual SO2 total 2output emission rate" as measured by the United States 3Environmental Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation 4Resource Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the 5most recent year for which data is available.6    (g) (Blank). All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting 7units that use coal or oil as a fuel and are not public 8GHG-emitting units shall permanently reduce all CO2e and 9copollutant emissions to zero no later than January 1, 2030.10    (h) (Blank). All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting 11units that use coal as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units 12shall permanently reduce CO2e emissions to zero no later than 13December 31, 2045. Any source or plant with such units must 14also reduce their CO2e emissions by 45% from existing 15emissions by no later than January 1, 2035. If the emissions 16reduction requirement is not achieved by December 31, 2035, 17the plant shall retire one or more units or otherwise reduce 18its CO2e emissions by 45% from existing emissions by June 30, 192038.20    (i) (Blank). All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting 21units that use gas as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting 22units shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant 23emissions to zero, including through unit retirement or the 24use of 100% green hydrogen or other similar technology that is 25commercially proven to achieve zero carbon emissions, 26according to the following:  SB1235- 8 -LRB104 03354 BDA 13376 b1        (1) No later than January 1, 2030: all EGUs and large 2    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emissions 3    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate of 4    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 5    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 6    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 7    community.8        (2) No later than January 1, 2040: all EGUs and large 9    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emission 10    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate 11    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are not located in or 12    within 3 miles of an environmental justice community 13    designated as of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment 14    eligible community. After January 1, 2035, each such EGU 15    and large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its 16    CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions 17    for CO2e, and shall be limited in operation to, on average, 18    6 hours or less per day, measured over a calendar year, and 19    shall not run for more than 24 consecutive hours except in 20    emergency conditions, as designated by a Regional 21    Transmission Organization or Independent System Operator.22        (3) No later than January 1, 2035: all EGUs and large 23    greenhouse gas-emitting units that began operation prior 24    to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 25    General Assembly and have a NOx emission rate of less than 26    or equal to 0.12 lb/MWh and a SO2 emission rate less than   SB1235- 9 -LRB104 03354 BDA 13376 b1    or equal to 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 2    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 3    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 4    community. Each such EGU and large greenhouse gas-emitting 5    unit shall reduce its CO2e emissions by at least 50% from 6    its existing emissions for CO2e no later than January 1, 7    2030.8        (4) No later than January 1, 2040: All remaining EGUs 9    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a heat 10    rate greater than or equal to 7000 BTU/kWh. Each such EGU 11    and Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its 12    CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions 13    for CO2e no later than January 1, 2035.14        (5) No later than January 1, 2045: all remaining EGUs 15    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units. 16    (j) (Blank). All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting 17units that use gas as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units 18shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 19zero, including through unit retirement or the use of 100% 20green hydrogen or other similar technology that is 21commercially proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by 22January 1, 2045.23    (k) (Blank). All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting 24units that utilize combined heat and power or cogeneration 25technology shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant 26emissions to zero, including through unit retirement or the   SB1235- 10 -LRB104 03354 BDA 13376 b1use of 100% green hydrogen or other similar technology that is 2commercially proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by 3January 1, 2045.4    (k-5) (Blank). No EGU or large greenhouse gas-emitting 5unit that uses gas as a fuel and is not a public GHG-emitting 6unit may emit, in any 12-month period, CO2e or copollutants in 7excess of that unit's existing emissions for those pollutants. 8    (l) (Blank). Notwithstanding subsections (g) through 9(k-5), large GHG-emitting units including EGUs may temporarily 10continue emitting CO2e and copollutants after any applicable 11deadline specified in any of subsections (g) through (k-5) if 12it has been determined, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) 13of this subsection, that ongoing operation of the EGU is 14necessary to maintain power grid supply and reliability or 15ongoing operation of large GHG-emitting unit that is not an 16EGU is necessary to serve as an emergency backup to 17operations. Up to and including the occurrence of an emission 18reduction deadline under subsection (i), all EGUs and large 19GHG-emitting units must comply with the following terms:20        (1) if an EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 21    participant in a regional transmission organization 22    intends to retire, it must submit documentation to the 23    appropriate regional transmission organization by the 24    appropriate deadline that meets all applicable regulatory 25    requirements necessary to obtain approval to permanently 26    cease operating the large GHG-emitting unit;  SB1235- 11 -LRB104 03354 BDA 13376 b1        (2) if any EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 2    participant in a regional transmission organization 3    receives notice that the regional transmission 4    organization has determined that continued operation of 5    the unit is required, the unit may continue operating 6    until the issue identified by the regional transmission 7    organization is resolved. The owner or operator of the 8    unit must cooperate with the regional transmission 9    organization in resolving the issue and must reduce its 10    emissions to zero, consistent with the requirements under 11    subsection (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as 12    applicable, as soon as practicable when the issue 13    identified by the regional transmission organization is 14    resolved; and15        (3) any large GHG-emitting unit that is not a 16    participant in a regional transmission organization shall 17    be allowed to continue emitting CO2e and copollutants 18    after the zero-emission date specified in subsection (g), 19    (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as applicable, in the 20    capacity of an emergency backup unit if approved by the 21    Illinois Commerce Commission.22    (m) (Blank). No variance, adjusted standard, or other 23regulatory relief otherwise available in this Act may be 24granted to the emissions reduction and elimination obligations 25in this Section.26    (n) (Blank). By June 30 of each year, beginning in 2025,   SB1235- 12 -LRB104 03354 BDA 13376 b1the Agency shall prepare and publish on its website a report 2setting forth the actual greenhouse gas emissions from 3individual units and the aggregate statewide emissions from 4all units for the prior year.5    (o) (Blank). Every 5 years beginning in 2025, the 6Environmental Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and 7Illinois Commerce Commission shall jointly prepare, and 8release publicly, a report to the General Assembly that 9examines the State's current progress toward its renewable 10energy resource development goals, the status of CO2e and 11copollutant emissions reductions, the current status and 12progress toward developing and implementing green hydrogen 13technologies, the current and projected status of electric 14resource adequacy and reliability throughout the State for the 15period beginning 5 years ahead, and proposed solutions for any 16findings. The Environmental Protection Agency, Illinois Power 17Agency, and Illinois Commerce Commission shall consult PJM 18Interconnection, LLC and Midcontinent Independent System 19Operator, Inc., or their respective successor organizations 20regarding forecasted resource adequacy and reliability needs, 21anticipated new generation interconnection, new transmission 22development or upgrades, and any announced large GHG-emitting 23unit closure dates and include this information in the report. 24The report shall be released publicly by no later than 25December 15 of the year it is prepared. If the Environmental 26Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois   SB1235- 13 -LRB104 03354 BDA 13376 b1Commerce Commission jointly conclude in the report that the 2data from the regional grid operators, the pace of renewable 3energy development, the pace of development of energy storage 4and demand response utilization, transmission capacity, and 5the CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions required by 6subsection (i) or (k-5) reasonably demonstrate that a resource 7adequacy shortfall will occur, including whether there will be 8sufficient in-state capacity to meet the zonal requirements of 9MISO Zone 4 or the PJM ComEd Zone, per the requirements of the 10regional transmission organizations, or that the regional 11transmission operators determine that a reliability violation 12will occur during the time frame the study is evaluating, then 13the Illinois Power Agency, in conjunction with the 14Environmental Protection Agency shall develop a plan to reduce 15or delay CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions 16requirements only to the extent and for the duration necessary 17to meet the resource adequacy and reliability needs of the 18State, including allowing any plants whose emission reduction 19deadline has been identified in the plan as creating a 20reliability concern to continue operating, including operating 21with reduced emissions or as emergency backup where 22appropriate. The plan shall also consider the use of renewable 23energy, energy storage, demand response, transmission 24development, or other strategies to resolve the identified 25resource adequacy shortfall or reliability violation.26        (1) In developing the plan, the Environmental   SB1235- 14 -LRB104 03354 BDA 13376 b1    Protection Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall hold 2    at least one workshop open to, and accessible at a time and 3    place convenient to, the public and shall consider any 4    comments made by stakeholders or the public. Upon 5    development of the plan, copies of the plan shall be 6    posted and made publicly available on the Environmental 7    Protection Agency's, the Illinois Power Agency's, and the 8    Illinois Commerce Commission's websites. All interested 9    parties shall have 60 days following the date of posting 10    to provide comment to the Environmental Protection Agency 11    and the Illinois Power Agency on the plan. All comments 12    submitted to the Environmental Protection Agency and the 13    Illinois Power Agency shall be encouraged to be specific, 14    supported by data or other detailed analyses, and, if 15    objecting to all or a portion of the plan, accompanied by 16    specific alternative wording or proposals. All comments 17    shall be posted on the Environmental Protection Agency's, 18    the Illinois Power Agency's, and the Illinois Commerce 19    Commission's websites. Within 30 days following the end of 20    the 60-day review period, the Environmental Protection 21    Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall revise the plan 22    as necessary based on the comments received and file its 23    revised plan with the Illinois Commerce Commission for 24    approval.25        (2) Within 60 days after the filing of the revised 26    plan at the Illinois Commerce Commission, any person   SB1235- 15 -LRB104 03354 BDA 13376 b1    objecting to the plan shall file an objection with the 2    Illinois Commerce Commission. Within 30 days after the 3    expiration of the comment period, the Illinois Commerce 4    Commission shall determine whether an evidentiary hearing 5    is necessary. The Illinois Commerce Commission shall also 6    host 3 public hearings within 90 days after the plan is 7    filed. Following the evidentiary and public hearings, the 8    Illinois Commerce Commission shall enter its order 9    approving or approving with modifications the reliability 10    mitigation plan within 180 days.11        (3) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall only 12    approve the plan if the Illinois Commerce Commission 13    determines that it will resolve the resource adequacy or 14    reliability deficiency identified in the reliability 15    mitigation plan at the least amount of CO2e and copollutant 16    emissions, taking into consideration the emissions impacts 17    on environmental justice communities, and that it will 18    ensure adequate, reliable, affordable, efficient, and 19    environmentally sustainable electric service at the lowest 20    total cost over time, taking into account the impact of 21    increases in emissions.22        (4) If the resource adequacy or reliability deficiency 23    identified in the reliability mitigation plan is resolved 24    or reduced, the Environmental Protection Agency and the 25    Illinois Power Agency may file an amended plan adjusting 26    the reduction or delay in CO2e and copollutant emission   SB1235- 16 -LRB104 03354 BDA 13376 b1    reduction requirements identified in the plan. 2(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 102-1031, eff. 5-27-22.) 3    (415 ILCS 5/3.131 rep.)4    Section 10. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5repealing Section 3.131. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.